Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-1302] Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Industrial oil" means any
compressor, turbine, or bearing oil, hydraulic oil, metal working oil or
refrigeration oil.

"Lubricating oil" means any oil
intended for use in an internal combustion crankcase, transmission, gearbox or
differential or an automobile, bus, truck, vessel, plane, train, heavy
equipment, or machinery powered by an internal combustion engine.

"Procuring agency" means any state or
county agency or any person contracting with that agency in respect to work
performed under a contract for lubricating oil, industrial oil or involves the
use of lubricating oil or industrial oil.

"Recycled oil" means used oil that
has been prepared for reuse as a petroleum product by refining, reclaiming, reprocessing
or other means provided that the preparation or use is operationally safe,
environmentally sound and complies with all laws, rules, and regulations.

"Virgin oil" means oil which has been
refined from crude oil and which has not been used or contaminated with
impurities. [L 1999, c 53, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next